Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 189 Traffic Regulations — Vehicle Equipment and Storage
189.330.
Turning and right-of-way at intersections.

When two (2) vehicles approach or enter an intersection from different roadways at approximately the same time, the operator of the vehicle on the left shall yield the right-of-way to the vehicle on the right.

The right-of-way rule declared in subsection (1) is modified at highways and through intersections and as otherwise stated in this chapter.

Preferential right-of-way may be indicated by stop signs or yield signs. The state highway commissioner, with reference to state highways, and local authorities, with reference to other highways under their jurisdiction, may designate any intersection as a stop intersection or as a yield intersection and erect stop signs or yield signs at one (1) or more entrances to such intersections.

Except when directed to proceed by a police officer, every operator of a vehicle approaching a stop sign shall stop at a clearly marked stop line but, if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the operator has view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering it. After having stopped, the operator shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time when such operator is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways.

The operator of a vehicle approaching a yield sign shall, in obedience to such sign, slow down to a speed reasonable for the existing conditions and, if required for safety to stop, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line but, if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the operator has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering it. After slowing and stopping, the operator shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time such operator is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways; provided, however, that if such an operator is involved in a collision with a vehicle in the intersection or junction of roadways after driving past a yield sign without stopping, such collision shall be deemed prima facie evidence of his failure to yield right-of-way.

The operator of a vehicle intending to turn shall do so as follows:

Right turns — both the approach for a right turn and a right turn shall be made as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway;

Left turns — the operator of a vehicle intending to turn left shall approach the turn in the extreme left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the direction of travel of such vehicle. Whenever practicable, the left turn shall be made to the left of the center of the intersection and so as to leave the intersection or other location in the extreme right-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the same direction as such vehicle on the roadway being entered.

The Transportation Cabinet and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may cause official traffic control devices to be placed and thereby require and direct that a different course from that specified in this section be traveled by turning vehicles and, when such devices are so placed, no operator shall turn a vehicle other than as directed and required by such devices.

The operator of any vehicle shall not turn such vehicle so as to proceed in the opposite direction unless such movement can be made in safety without interfering with other traffic.

The operator of a vehicle intending to turn to the left within an intersection or into an alley, private road, or driveway shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction which is within the intersection or so close thereto as to constitute an immediate hazard.

The operator of a vehicle about to enter or cross a roadway from any place other than another roadway shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles approaching on the roadway to be entered or crossed.

On highways with a center lane restricted for left turns off the highway by vehicles proceeding in both directions:

A left turn shall not be made from any other lane; and

A vehicle shall not be driven in a center lane as described in this subsection except when preparing for or making a left turn off the highway or merging onto the highway after making a left turn from a side road or other entrance.

History.

2739g-37, 2739g-42: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 148, § 2; 1978, ch. 46, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 144, effective July 15, 1980; 2006, ch. 173, § 14, effective July 12, 2006.

189.335.
Authority to install yield right-of-way signs.

When it is determined, upon the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation at an intersection, that vehicle stop signs are more restrictive than necessary for the safe and efficient control of that intersection’s vehicular movements, yield right-of-way signs may be installed by the Department of Highways on one or more of the intersection approaches for the purpose of assigning right-of-way. The driver of a vehicle, in obedience to a yield right-of-way sign shall yield right-of-way to vehicles not so obligated to yield or stop which are within the intersection or approaching so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard; but such driver, having so yielded, may proceed at such time as a safe interval occurs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 148, § 1, effective June 16, 1960.

189.336.
Installation of flasher lights near schools — Speed limits.

Fiscal courts, with respect to school zones situated in unincorporated areas, may authorize by resolution installation at county expense of school flasher lights and other traffic control devices on highways in school zones as they deem reasonable and necessary.

Cities, with respect to school zones within their incorporated areas, may authorize by ordinance installation at city expense of school flasher lights and other traffic control devices on highways in school zones as they deem reasonable and necessary.

The speed limit on all highways where school flasher lights are in operation shall be determined by the governmental unit having control of the highway where a school flasher light is in operation. Flasher lights shall be placed one-eighth (1/8) of a mile on each side of the principal school building where practical. The governmental unit having control of the highway where the lights are in operation shall erect signs notifying motorists of the speed limit.

“Highways” as used in this section shall mean any public road or street maintained by a city, county or the state.

Any traffic control devices erected by any governmental unit shall conform to standards and specifications authorized by KRS

189.337

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 49, § 1; 1974, ch. 27, § 1; 1978, ch. 227, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Fiscal courts, and cities by ordinance, may authorize the installation of traffic devices that conform to the standards and specifications of KRS

189.337

on highways in school zones as they deem reasonable and necessary with or without authorization from the bureau (now department) of highways, except where federal aid highways are involved, since any traffic control devices placed thereon must be approved by the bureau (now department) of highways as required by 23 USCS, § 109(d).

OAG 74-774

.

A board of education in making reasonable rules for the control and management of the schools may establish student safety patrols for street traffic instructional purposes inside the limits of school property but may not make or enforce traffic regulations on roads or driveways within or outside the limits of school property.

OAG 75-614

.

A city ordinance making school crossing guards, who are sworn peace officers with authority to issue citations and place and remove traffic control devices, employes of the school board rather than the city is invalid under KRS

94.360

(now repealed), giving a city exclusive control over its streets, this section, giving a city exclusive authority to place traffic control devices, and Ky. Const., § 184 requiring school board funds be used only for the purpose of education.

OAG 79-107

.

The city has authority to employ school crossing guards to regulate traffic, while the local school board does not; due to the city’s exclusive control over its streets, no other governmental entity has similar control.

OAG 92-6

.

The city school board does not have the authority to regulate traffic, as the city has exclusive control over traffic and traffic control devices.

OAG 92-6

.

There is no statutory authority allowing the city to abdicate its responsibility and jurisdiction over existing city streets and in fact, subsection (2) of this section expressly authorizes a city, by ordinance, to install, at city expense, school flasher lights in school zones, as necessary.

OAG 92-6

.

189.337.
Traffic control signs, uniform standards to be prescribed — Sign to conform — Prohibited activities.

As used in this chapter, “official traffic control devices” shall mean all signs, signals, markings, and devices placed or erected by authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of regulating, warning, or dividing traffic.

The Department of Highways shall promulgate and adopt a manual of standards and specifications for a uniform system of official traffic control devices for use upon all roads and streets open to public travel. The manual and its future revisions and supplements shall be applicable to all roads and streets under the control of the Department of Highways or any county or incorporated city.

All traffic control devices installed on any road or street after the adoption of the manual shall conform to the provisions thereof. Satisfactory operating traffic devices in use on the date of the adoption of the manual may continue to be used; however, if such devices are replaced or revised, they must be replaced or revised in conformance with the provisions of the manual.

No person shall place, maintain, or display on or in the view of any highway any authorized sign, signal, marking, or device which resembles, purports to be, or is an imitation of an official traffic control device or signal.

A person shall not attempt to or in fact alter, twist, deface, injure, knock down, or interfere with the effective operation of any official traffic control device or signal, or any part thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 46, §§ 1 to 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 46, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 2006, ch. 173, § 15, effective July 12, 2006.

189.338.
Limitation of colored lights used in traffic-control signals — Rules for vehicular and pedestrian traffic controlled by traffic-control signals — Affirmative defense for motorcyclists.

Whenever traffic is controlled by traffic-control signals exhibiting different colored lights or colored lighted arrows, successively one at a time or in combination, only the colors green, red, and yellow shall be used, except for special pedestrian signals carrying a word legend or symbolic message, and said lights shall indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles and pedestrians as follows:

Green indication.

Vehicular traffic facing a circular green signal may proceed straight through or turn right or left unless a sign at such place prohibits either such turn. But vehicular traffic, including vehicles turning right or left, shall yield the right-of-way to other vehicles and to pedestrians lawfully within the intersection or an adjacent crosswalk at the time such signal is exhibited.

Vehicular traffic facing a green arrow signal, shown alone or in combination with another indication, may cautiously enter the intersection only to make the movement indicated by such arrow, or such other movement as is permitted by other indications shown at the same time. Such vehicular traffic shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the intersection.

Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal, pedestrians facing any green signal, except when the sole green signal is a turn arrow, may proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked crosswalk.

Vehicular traffic that entered an intersection on a circular green or yellow indication is allowed to complete a left turn during the red indication.

Steady yellow indication.

Vehicular traffic facing a steady yellow signal is thereby warned that the related green movement is being terminated or that a red indication will be exhibited immediately thereafter when vehicular traffic shall not enter the intersection.

Pedestrians facing a steady yellow signal, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal, are thereby advised that there is insufficient time to cross the roadway before a red indication is shown, and no pedestrian shall then start to cross the roadway.

Steady red indication.

Vehicular traffic facing a circular red signal alone shall stop at a clearly marked stop line but, if none, then before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then before entering the intersection and shall remain standing until a green indication is shown, except as follows:

The driver of a vehicle which is stopped as required by this paragraph with the intention of making a right turn, may make such right turn, after stopping, unless an official sign has been erected prohibiting such movement, but shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and other traffic lawfully proceeding through the intersection;

The driver of a vehicle which is stopped as required by this paragraph whose vehicle is in the left lane of a one-way highway with the intention of making a left turn onto the left lane of another one-way highway with the flow of traffic, may make such left turn, after stopping, unless an official sign has been erected prohibiting such movement, but shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and other traffic lawfully proceeding through the intersection; and

In instances where there are two (2) right or left turn lanes, an allowable turn under this paragraph may be made from either lane unless a regulatory sign specifically prohibits it.

Cities and counties may, by ordinance, and the department of highways may, by regulation, prohibit any such right or left turn against a steady red signal at any intersection, which prohibition shall be effective when an official sign prohibiting such movement is erected at the intersection.

Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal, pedestrians facing a steady red signal alone shall not enter the roadway.

In the event an official traffic-control signal is erected and maintained at a place other than an intersection, the provisions of this section shall be applicable except as to those provisions which by their nature can have no application. Any stop required shall be made at a sign or marking on the pavement indicating where the stop shall be made, but in the absence of any such sign or marking the stop shall be made at the signal.

Whenever an illuminated flashing red or yellow light is used in a traffic signal or with a traffic sign it shall require obedience by vehicular traffic as follows:

Flashing red (stop signal) — When a red lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, operators of vehicles shall stop at a clearly marked stop line but, if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the operator has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering it, and the right to proceed shall be subject to the rules applicable after making a stop at a stop sign; and

Flashing yellow (caution signal) — When a yellow lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, operators of vehicles may proceed through the intersection or past such signal only with caution.

Any person operating a motorcycle who violates subsection (3) of this section by entering or crossing an intersection controlled by a traffic control signal against a steady red light shall have an affirmative defense to that charge if the person establishes all of the following conditions:

The motorcycle was brought to a complete stop;

The traffic control signal continued to show a steady red light for one hundred twenty (120) seconds or the traffic control signal at the intersection has completed two (2) lighting cycles;

The traffic control signal was apparently malfunctioning or, if programmed or engineered to change to a green light only after detecting the approach of a motor vehicle, the signal apparently failed to detect the arrival of a motorcycle; and

No motor vehicle or person was approaching on the street or highway to be crossed or entered, or any approaching person or vehicle was so far away from the intersection that it did not constitute an immediate hazard.

The affirmative defense outlined in subsection (6) of this section shall only apply to a violation for entering or crossing an intersection controlled by a traffic signal against a steady red light and shall not provide a defense to any other civil or criminal action.

In the event a motorcyclist exercises the affirmative defense provisions set forth in subsection (6) of this section, the Transportation Cabinet or its employees are specifically immune from any and all civil liability arising from any such claim, lawsuit, or dispute. Any claim, lawsuit, or dispute against the Transportation Cabinet as a result of the affirmative defense set forth in subsection (6) of this section, shall be brought using the provisions outlined in KRS Chapter 44.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 201, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 46, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 156, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 2006, ch. 173, § 16, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 116, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

Opinions of Attorney General.

While subsection (4) of this section does not authorize the use of mid-block stop signs, it does permit the use of mid-block traffic-control signals exhibiting different colored lights, or colored lighted arrows, successively one at a time or in combination.

OAG 78-799

.

189.340.
Overtaking vehicles, bicycles, or electric low — eed scooters — Traffic lanes — Following vehicles — Exemption for commercial motor vehicle platoon trailing vehicle.

Vehicles overtaking other vehicles proceeding in the same direction shall pass to the left of them and shall not again drive to the right until reasonably clear of those vehicles. Vehicles overtaking streetcars may pass either to the right or left when so directed by a police officer, when on a one (1) way street or where the location of the tracks prevents compliance with this section, with regard for other traffic.

Vehicles overtaking a bicycle or electric low-speed scooter proceeding in the same direction shall:

If there is more than one (1) lane for traffic proceeding in the same direction, move the vehicle to the immediate left, if the lane is available and moving in the lane is reasonably safe; or

If there is only one (1) lane for traffic proceeding in the same direction, pass to the left of the bicycle or electric low-speed scooter at a distance of not less than three (3) feet between any portion of the vehicle and the bicycle or electric low-speed scooter and maintain that distance until safely past the overtaken bicycle or electric low-speed scooter. If space on the roadway is not available to have a minimum distance of three (3) feet between the vehicle and the bicycle or electric low-speed scooter, then the driver of the passing vehicle shall use reasonable caution in passing the bicyclist or electric low-speed scooter operator.

The driver of a motor vehicle may drive to the left of the center of a roadway, including when a no-passing zone is marked in accordance with subsection (6) of this section, to pass a person operating a bicycle or electric low-speed scooter only if the roadway to the left of the center is unobstructed for a sufficient distance to permit the driver to pass the person operating the bicycle or electric low-speed scooter safely and avoid interference with oncoming traffic. This paragraph does not authorize driving on the left side of the center of the roadway when otherwise prohibited under state law.

The operator of a bicycle or electric low-speed scooter shall not ride more than two (2) abreast on a single highway lane unless operating on any part of the roadway marked exclusively for bicycle use. Persons riding two (2) abreast shall not impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic.

The operator of a vehicle may overtake and pass upon the right of another vehicle only under the following conditions:

When the vehicle overtaken is making or about to make a left turn;

Upon a roadway with unobstructed pavement of sufficient width for two (2) or more lines of vehicles moving lawfully in the direction being traveled by the overtaking vehicle.

The operator of a vehicle may overtake and pass another vehicle upon the right only under conditions permitting such movements in safety. Such movement shall not be made by driving off the roadway unless passing vehicle comes to a complete stop and such movement may be made safely.

No vehicle shall be driven to the left side of the center of the roadway in overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction unless the left side is clearly visible and free of oncoming traffic for a sufficient distance ahead to permit overtaking and passing to be completely made without interfering with the safe operation of any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction or any vehicle overtaken. In every event, the overtaking vehicle must return to the right-hand side of the roadway before coming within two hundred (200) feet of any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction.

The commissioner of highways is hereby authorized to determine those portions of any highway where overtaking and passing or driving to the left of the roadway would be especially hazardous and may by appropriate signs or markings on the roadway indicate the beginning and end of such zones, and when such signs or markings are in place and clearly visible to an ordinarily observant person, every driver of a vehicle shall obey the directions thereof, except as provided for in subsection (2)(b) of this section.

Whenever any roadway has been divided into three (3) clearly marked lanes for travel, the following additional rules shall apply:

A vehicle shall be driven as nearly as may be practical entirely within a single lane and shall not be moved from that lane until the driver has first ascertained that the movement can be made with safety;

A vehicle shall not be driven in the center lane except when overtaking and passing another vehicle where the roadway is clearly visible and the center lane is clear of traffic within a safe distance, or in preparation for a left turn or where a center lane is at the time allocated exclusively to traffic moving in the direction in which the vehicle is proceeding and is signposted to give notice of the allocation; and

Official signs may be erected directing slow-moving traffic to use a designated lane or allocating specified lanes to traffic moving in the same direction and operators of vehicles shall obey the directions of such signs.

A vehicle shall not be driven in the left lane of any limited access highway of four (4) lanes or more with a posted speed limit of at least sixty-five (65) miles per hour, except in overtaking a slower vehicle, yielding to traffic coming onto such a highway, or when traffic conditions exist which would prohibit safe use of the right or center lanes.

Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the operator of a motor vehicle shall not follow another vehicle more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having regard for the speed of the vehicle and the traffic upon and condition of the highway.

Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the operator of any motor truck, semitrailer truck, bus, or heavy construction equipment unit, when traveling upon a highway outside of a business or residential district, shall not follow within two hundred fifty (250) feet of another such vehicle or equipment unit. This subsection shall not prevent overtaking and passing, nor shall it apply to any lane specially designated for use of motor trucks or semitrailer trucks, buses or heavy construction equipment units.

Paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection shall not apply to a trailing commercial motor vehicle involved in a platoon as defined in KRS

281.010

, but shall apply to the commercial motor vehicle leading a platoon.

HISTORY:

2739g-40: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 51; 1952, ch. 206, § 2; 1962, ch. 288, § 1; 1964, ch. 65, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(4); 1978, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 27, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 245, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2006, ch. 173, § 17, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 43, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 33, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 38, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 22, § 7, effective June 27, 2019.

189.345.
Prohibitions against driving on left side of roadway.

No vehicle shall be driven on the left side of the roadway under the following conditions:

When approaching or upon the crest of a grade or a curve in the highway where the operator’s view is obstructed within such distance as to create a hazard in the event another vehicle might approach from the opposite direction;

When approaching within one hundred (100) feet of or traversing any intersection or railroad grade crossing;

When the view is obstructed upon approaching within one hundred (100) feet of any bridge, viaduct or tunnel.

The foregoing limitations shall not apply upon a one (1) way roadway, nor when an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the left of the center of the highway; provided, any person so doing shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles traveling in the proper direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such distance as to constitute an immediate hazard, nor to the operator of a vehicle turning left into or from an alley, private road or driveway.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 46, § 7, effective June 17, 1978.

189.350.
Assistance in passing or overtaking.

The operator of a vehicle about to be overtaken and passed shall give way to the right in favor of the overtaking vehicle if the overtaking vehicle is a motor vehicle.

In all cases of meeting, passing, or overtaking of vehicles such assistance shall be given by the operator and occupants of each vehicle, respectively, to the other as the circumstances reasonably demand, in order to obtain clearance and avoid accidents.

History.

2739g-41, 2739g-43; 1994, ch. 203, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

189.360.
Passing cars receiving or discharging passengers.

Whenever a car traveling upon rails placed in the center or approximate center of a highway is stopped for the purpose of receiving or discharging passengers, every operator of a vehicle approaching the car from the rear and proceeding in the same direction shall bring his vehicle to a full stop and shall not start up or attempt to pass until the car has finished receiving or discharging passengers.

Where safety isles of reasonable size are established, leaving space between the track and the curb or edge of the highway sufficient for the passage of traffic, overtaking vehicles shall pass between the isle and the curb or edge of the highway, without observing subsection (1).

History.

2739g-46.

189.370.
Passing stopped school or church bus prohibited — Application to properly marked vehicles — Rebuttable presumption as to identity of violator.

If any school or church bus used in the transportation of children is stopped upon a highway for the purpose of receiving or discharging passengers, with the stop arm and signal lights activated, the operator of a vehicle approaching from any direction shall bring his vehicle to a stop and shall not proceed until the bus has completed receiving or discharging passengers and has been put into motion. The stop requirement provided for in this section shall not apply to vehicles approaching a stopped bus from the opposite direction upon a highway of four (4) or more lanes.

Subsection (1) of this section shall be applicable only when the bus displays the markings and equipment required by Kentucky minimum specifications for school buses.

If any vehicle is witnessed to be in violation of subsection (1) of this section and the identity of the operator is not otherwise apparent, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person in whose name the vehicle is registered or leased was the operator of the vehicle at the time of the alleged violation and is subject to the penalties as provided for in KRS 189.990(5).

History.

2739g-46a, 2739g-69l: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 96, § 1; 1960, ch. 123, § 2; 1964, ch. 65, § 3; 1986, ch. 443, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 262, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

189.375.
School or church bus signaling device — Use — Stopping regulated.

No school or church bus shall be licensed or operated for the transportation of school children unless it is equipped with bus alternating flashing signal lamps and a stop arm folding sign. The bus body shall be equipped with a system of four (4) red signal lamps, two (2) on the front and two (2) on the rear of the bus, and four (4) amber signal lamps. Each amber signal lamp shall be located near each red signal lamp, at the same level, but closer to the vertical centerline of the bus. The bus body shall be equipped with a stop arm folding sign on the driver’s side with letters at least six (6) inches in height displaying the word “stop” on both sides. Prior to stopping the school bus for the purpose of receiving or discharging school children, the driver shall activate the amber flashing signal lamps. Once the bus comes to a complete stop, the driver shall extend the stop arm and activate the red flashing signal lights prior to opening the door so it shall be plainly visible to traffic approaching from both directions that the bus is in the process of receiving or discharging passengers. No driver shall stop a school or church bus for receiving or discharging passengers in a no passing zone which does not afford reasonable visibility to approaching motor vehicles from both directions unless a “School Bus Stop Ahead” sign has been installed a reasonable distance before that spot in the roadway. No driver shall stop a school or church bus for the purpose of receiving passengers from or discharging passengers to the opposite side of the road on a highway of four (4) or more lanes; provided, that this provision does not prohibit the discharging of passengers at a marked pedestrian crossing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 41; 1958, ch. 110, § 1; 1964, ch. 65, § 4; 1986, ch. 443, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 262, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 2006, ch. 173, § 18, effective July 12, 2006.

189.377.
Yielding right-of-way to solid waste collection service vehicle.

As used in this section, “solid waste collection service vehicle” means a vehicle used by a solid waste collection service provider registered with a county pursuant to KRS

224.43-315

(2).

Upon approaching and passing a stationary solid waste collection service vehicle that is giving a visual signal by alternately displaying flashing yellow, red, white, or amber lights, the operator of the approaching motor vehicle shall yield the right-of- way to the solid waste collection service vehicle or any collection service employees by:

Reducing to, and maintaining, a safe speed for weather, road conditions, and vehicular or pedestrian traffic; and

Proceeding with due care and caution.

This section may be cited as the Slow Down to Get Around Law.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 21, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

189.378.
Funeral processions.

“Funeral procession,” as used in this section, means two (2) or more vehicles accompanying the body of a deceased person when each vehicle has its headlights on or is displaying a pennant attached in such a manner as to be clearly visible to approaching traffic.

A vehicle in a funeral procession has the right-of-way at an intersection and may proceed through the intersection if the procession is led by an escort vehicle displaying flashing yellow, red, or blue lights, except:

When the right-of-way is required by an emergency vehicle as defined by KRS

189.910

;

When vehicles in the procession are directed otherwise by a police or safety officer; or

When the vehicle is a train or locomotive.

Before assuming the right-of-way, a person who drives a vehicle in a funeral procession shall exercise due caution with regard to crossing traffic.

A person who drives a vehicle that is not part of a funeral procession shall not drive the vehicle between the vehicles of the funeral procession or otherwise interfere with the progress of the procession, except when:

The person is authorized to do so by a police or safety officer; or

The vehicle is an emergency vehicle as defined by KRS

189.910

.

A person who drives a vehicle that is not a part of a funeral procession shall not illuminate the vehicle headlights or engage in any other act for the purpose of securing the right-of-way granted to funeral processions.

The escort vehicle, hearse, or other vehicles in a procession may be equipped with flashing amber lights for the purpose of notifying the general public of the procession and gaining the right-of-way at intersections, or signaling the end of a procession.

Persons authorized to use flashing lights as defined in KRS

189.920

may use them while accompanying a funeral procession to warn traffic that a procession is approaching or that it is in progress.

When a funeral procession is in progress, a person driving a vehicle not in the procession shall not pass or overtake any vehicle in the procession unless:

The person is directed to do so by a police or safety officer;

The procession is on a street, road, or highway outside the corporate limits of a city, town, or urban-county; or

The procession is on an interstate highway or a state parkway.

Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 251, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

189.380.
Signals.

A person shall not turn a vehicle or move right or left upon a roadway until the movement can be made with reasonable safety nor without giving an appropriate signal in the manner hereinafter provided.

A signal indicating the intention to turn right or left shall be given continuously for not less than the last one hundred (100) feet traveled by the motor vehicle before the turn.

A bus driver shall not stop or suddenly decrease the speed of a vehicle without first giving an appropriate signal to traffic following the bus.

All signals required for a motor vehicle shall be given by signal lamps or mechanical signal devices.

A signal required for a vehicle that is not a motor vehicle may be given by either hand signals, signal lamps, or mechanical signal devices. The signal shall be given intermittently for the last fifty (50) feet traveled by the vehicle before the turn.

Hand signals shall be executed in the following manner when operating a vehicle that is not a motor vehicle:

The hand and arm shall be extended horizontally from the left side of the vehicle to indicate a left turn;

The left arm shall be extended horizontally with the hand and arm extended upward from the elbow or the right arm and hand shall be extended horizontally to indicate a right turn;

Either arm shall be extended horizontally with the hand and arm extended downward from the elbow to indicate a stop or decrease in speed.

History.

2739g-50, 2739g-69p: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 54; 1954, ch. 142, § 1; 1960, ch. 123, § 3; 1978, ch. 46, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 262, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 203, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 327, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.